Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-2532
False affidavit; false oath; penalty.

Whoever knowingly or willfully makes a false affidavit or takes a false oath regarding the qualifications of any person to sign petitions under the Municipal Initiative and Referendum Act shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor with a fine not to exceed three hundred dollars.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 32;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 183.